latin.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghilmnopqrstuvzwxykx</alphabet>

<sdefs>
    
    <sdef n="n"     c="Noun"/>
    <!-- Nouns -->
    	 <!-- Gender, latin has 3 genders: masculine, feminine and neuter-->

    	  <sdef n="m"    c="Masculine (animate)"/>
    	  <sdef n="nt"    c="Neuter"/>
    	  <sdef n="f"     c="Feminine"/>


	  <!-- Number, unlike greek latin has 2 numbers: singular and plural-->

    	  <sdef n="sg"    c="Singular"/>
    	  <sdef n="pl"    c="Plural"/>

	  <!-- Cases, latin has basically 6 cases, with locative that triggers for a very small set of Toponyms-->

	  <sdef n="nom"   c="Nominative"/>
    	  <sdef n="gen"   c="Genitive"/>
    	  <sdef n="dat"   c="Dative"/>
    	  <sdef n="acc"   c="Accusative"/>
    	  <sdef n="loc"   c="Locative"/>
    	  <sdef n="voc"   c="Vocative"/>
    	  <sdef n="abl"   c="Ablative"/>


  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
  <pardef n="rosa__n_f">
   
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ae</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ae</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>am</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

    <e><p><l>ae</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>arum</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>is</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>as</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ae</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>is</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

    
  </pardef>
</pardefs>
  <section id="main" type="standard">

		<e lm="rosa"><p><l>ros</l><r>rosa</r></p><par n="rosa__n_f"/></e>
		<e lm="pugna"><p><l>pugn</l><r>pugna</r></p><par n="rosa__n_f"/></e>
		<e lm="victoria"><p><l>victori</l><r>victoria</r></p><par n="rosa__n_f"/></e>
		<e lm="familia"><p><l>famili</l><r>famili</r></p><par n="rosa__n_f"/></e>
		<e lm="via"><p><l>vi</l><r>via</r></p><par n="rosa__n_f"/></e>
		
	


  
  </section>
</dictionary>
